Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1503
Education Commission of the States; bylaws; file.

Pursuant to Article III (i) of the Compact for Education, the Education Commission of the States shall file a copy of its bylaws and any amendment thereto with the Governor.

Laws 1967, c. 516, § 3, p. 1737;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2503;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1002.